Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.210

Destruction of animal by law enforcement officer—Immunity from liability.

This chapter shall not limit the right of a law enforcement officer to destroy an animal that has been seriously injured and would otherwise continue to suffer. Such action shall be undertaken with reasonable prudence and, whenever possible, in consultation with a licensed veterinarian and the owner of the animal.

Law enforcement officers and licensed veterinarians shall be immune from civil and criminal liability for actions taken under this chapter if reasonable prudence is exercised in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1987 c 335 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1987 c 335: See notes following RCW 16.52.085.